Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Administration

§ 2251.
Real Estate Commission.

A Vermont Real Estate Commission is created, consisting of seven members. One member of the Commission shall be an attorney at law. Two shall be members of the public who have no financial interest in the activities regulated under this chapter, other than as consumers or possible consumers of its services. These persons shall have no financial interest personally or through a spouse, parent, child, brother, or sister. “Financial interest” means dealing in goods or services that are uniquely related to activities regulated under this chapter, or investing anything of value in a business licensed under this chapter.

Three members of the Commission shall be licensed real estate brokers whose vocations shall have been that of real estate broker for at least four years. At least one of the broker members shall not be a member of a professional real estate association at the time of appointment or at any time during tenure as a member. One of the Commission members shall be a licensed salesperson. If a salesperson becomes a broker while serving on the Commission, that salesperson shall become ineligible to continue to serve as the salesperson member of the Commission.

Commission members shall be appointed by the Governor pursuant to

3 V.S.A. §§ 129b

and 2004. To the extent possible, appointments shall be geographically representative.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 193

, § 13, eff. June 28, 1963;

1969, No. 283

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1985, No. 6

, § 1;

2005, No. 27

, § 65.

§ 2252.
Powers and duties.

The Commission shall adopt rules in accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 necessary for the performance of its duties, including:

a definition of the activities that may be performed only by a licensee, in accordance with section 2211 of this title;

qualifications for obtaining licensure, in accordance with section 2292 of this title;

explanations of appeal and other significant rights given to applicants and the public;

procedures for disciplinary and reinstatement cases;

criteria for determining whether or not a deposit is reasonably expected to earn a substantial amount of interest in accordance with subsections 2214(b) and (c) of this title. The criteria shall include the following:

the amount of the deposit and the time period the deposit is expected to be held;

the cost of establishing and maintaining an interest-bearing account, including minimum account balances, service charges, legal fees, accounting fees, and tax reporting procedures;

the nature of the transaction involved.

The Commission shall:

if applications for licensure by examination are pending, offer examinations at least four times each year and pass upon the qualifications of applicants for licensing;

use the administrative and legal services provided by the Office of Professional Regulation under 3 V.S.A. chapter 5;

investigate suspected unprofessional conduct.

The Commission may:

investigate suspected cases of unauthorized practice of activities regulated by this chapter, and refer any such case to the Attorney General or a State’s Attorney for possible prosecution and injunctive relief;

conduct hearings;

administer oaths and issue subpoenas pursuant to

3 V.S.A. §§ 809a

and 809b;

issue orders relating to discovery in the same manner as a judge under the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure, which may be enforced in the same manner as a subpoena;

adopt rules relating to the procedures to be followed in handling complaints and conducting hearings under this chapter;

receive assistance from the Attorney General or other State agencies, so long as the assistance is not contrary to any other State law.

The Commission shall provide proposed rules to the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation for review and comment. The Director’s comments shall be forwarded to the administrative rules committee.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 283

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1985, No. 6

, § 1;

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.) § 4(d);

1991, No. 86

, § 5, eff. June 26, 1991.

§ 2253.
Commission procedures.

Annually, the Commission shall meet to elect a chair, a vice chair, and a secretary.

Meetings may be called by the Chair and shall be called upon the request of any other two members.

Meetings shall be warned and conducted in accordance with 1 V.S.A. chapter 5.

A majority of the members of the Commission shall be a quorum for transacting business, and all action shall be taken upon a majority vote of the members present and voting.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 66

, § 1;

1969, No. 283

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1985, No. 6

, § 1;

2005, No. 27

, § 66.

§ 2254.
Repealed. 1985, No. 6, § 1.

§ 2255.
Fees.

Applicants and persons regulated under this chapter shall pay the following fees:

Application (A) Broker license $ 100.00 (B) Salesperson license $ 100.00 (C) Brokerage firm registration $ 200.00 (D) Branch office registration $ 200.00 (2) Biennial renewal of broker or salesperson license $ 240.00 (3) Biennial brokerage firm or branch office registration renewal $ 400.00 (4) Temporary permit $ 25.00 (5) Transfer of license $ 10.00 (6) Transfer to inactive status $ 25.00 (7) Education course review $ 100.00

Click to view

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 6

, § 1; amended

1989, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 56;

1995, No. 47

, § 25;

2013, No. 27

, § 28;

2013, No. 191

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

2015, No. 57

, § 2;

2019, No. 70

, § 20.